Nevada, session 83, AB317.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A board of county commissioners may create a program to
provide housing for persons experiencing homelessness.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the program
must provide:
-
*AB317*

– 2 –
(a) A housing facility for persons experiencing homelessness
that consists of:
(1) Individual units that each include a bedroom,
bathroom, living room and front porch; and
(2) A community kitchen; and
(b) Supportive services to the persons experiencing
homelessness who reside in the facility.
3. An individual unit of the housing facility for a program
created pursuant to this section must not include a kitchen.
4. As used in this section, “supportive services” includes,
without limitation, social services, community support services,
case management services, employment services, health care and
behavioral health treatment.
Sec. 2. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A city council or other governing body of an incorporated
city may create a program to provide housing for persons
experiencing homelessness.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the program
must provide:
(a) A housing facility for persons experiencing homelessness
that consists of:
(1) Individual units that each include a bedroom,
bathroom, living room and front porch; and
(2) A community kitchen; and
(b) Supportive services to the persons experiencing
homelessness who reside in the facility.
3. An individual unit of the housing facility for a program
created pursuant to this section must not include a kitchen.
4. As used in this section, “supportive services” includes,
without limitation, social services, community support services,
case management services, employment services, health care and
behavioral health treatment.
H
-
*AB317*